Hawaii statutes.
§26-13 Department of health. (a) The
department of health shall be headed by a single executive to be known as the
director of health.

There shall be, within the department of
health, an advisory board to be known as the board of health, which shall advise
the director of health on matters within the jurisdiction of the department of
health. The board of health shall consist of eleven voting members appointed
by the governor as provided in section 26-34 and shall include the director of
[human services] as an ex officio nonvoting member. The appointed members
shall include at least one resident of each of the major counties including the
county of Kalawao. The appointed members shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the
performance of their duties.

The department shall administer programs
designed to protect, preserve, care for, and improve the physical and mental
health of the people of the State. Without limit to the generality of the
foregoing, the programs shall include the administration and enforcement of
matters and laws of public health of the State, including the state hospital,
but excluding assistance and care for the indigent and the medically indigent.

(b) The functions and authority heretofore
exercised by the board of health (excluding assistance and care for the
indigent and the medically indigent) and the department of institutions with
respect to the state hospital and the dental health treatment function of the
department of public instruction as heretofore constituted are transferred to
the department of health established by this chapter.

The governor shall define and differentiate
dental health treatment from dental health instruction and shall provide for
the gradual transfer of any personnel within the definition of dental health
treatment to the department of health. This section shall not be construed to
require the transfer from the department of education to the department of
health of any dental hygienist having a teacher's certificate and employed by
the department of public instruction immediately prior to November 25,
1959. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; Supp, §14A-18; HRS §26-13; am L 1974, c 252, §1;
am L 1983, c 260, §1; am L 1995, c 189, §§1, 26; am L 1998, c 133, §5]

Note

Distribution of cigarette tax revenues study; findings and
recommendations to legislature and governor by November 1, 2016. L 2016, c 88.

Cross References

Waimano ridge; approval and authorization for new or expanded
uses, see §171-64.5.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next